Utah statutes.
53B-6-105.5.   Technology Initiative Advisory Board -- Composition --
Duties.
(1)  There is created a Technology Initiative Advisory Board to assist and
make recommendations to the State Board of Regents in its administration of
the Engineering and Computer Science Initiative established under Section
53B-6-105.
(2) (a)  The advisory board shall consist of individuals appointed by the
governor from business and industry who have expertise in the areas of
engineering, computer science, and related technologies.
(b)  The advisory board shall select a chair and cochair.
(c)  The advisory board shall meet at the call of the chair.
(d)  The State Board of Regents, through the commissioner of higher education,
shall provide staff support for the advisory board.
(3)  Members of the advisory board shall receive no compensation for their
service on the board, but may receive per diem and expenses incurred in the
performance of their duties at rates established by the Division of Finance
under Sections 63A-3-106 and 63A-3-107.
(4)  The advisory board shall:
(a)  make recommendations to the State Board of Regents on the allocation and
distribution of monies appropriated to fund:
(i)  the faculty incentive program established in Section 53B-6-105.9;
(ii)  equipment purchases required to improve the quality of instructional
programs in engineering, computer science, and related technology; and
(iii)  the scholarship program established in Section 53B-6-105.7.
(b)  prepare  a strategic plan that details actions required by the State
Board of Regents to meet the intent of the Engineering and Technology Science
Initiative;
(c)  review and assess engineering, computer science, and related technology
programs currently being offered at higher education institutions and their
impact on the economic prosperity of the state;
(d)  provide the State Board of Regents with an assessment and reporting plan
that:
(i)  measures results against expectations under the initiative, including
verification of the matching requirements for institutions of higher education
to receive monies under Section 53B-6-105.9; and
(ii)  includes an analysis of market demand for technical employment, program
articulation among higher education institutions in engineering, computer
science, and related technology, tracking of student placement, student
admission to the initiative program by region, transfer rates, and retention
in and graduation rates from the initiative program; and
(e)  make an annual report of its activities to the State Board of Regents,
the Legislature through the Education Interim Committee and the Higher
Education Appropriations Subcommittee, and the governor.
(5)  The annual report of the Technology Initiative Advisory Board shall
include the summary report of the institutional matches described in Section
53B-6-105.9.
